District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Broadband Price Transparency Regulation Emergency Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 39 of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding new section designations to read as
follows:
“28-3903a. Cease and desist orders; summary suspension; summary closure.
“28-3904a. Special price information standard for broadband services complying with
federal rules.”.
(b) A new section 28-3904a is added to read as follows:
“§ 28-3904a. Special price information standard for broadband services complying with
federal rules.
“A merchant providing broadband internet access who complies with the broadband
consumer label requirements of 47 C.F.R. § 8.1 as those requirements existed on January 1,
2026, shall be deemed compliant with the requirements of § 28-3904(a)(12).”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of the effective date of the Enhancing Consumer Protection
Procedures Amendment Act of 2026, enacted on June 25, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-344; 73 DCR
9162).
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § l-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2